Utah statutes.
17D-1-508.   Special service district obligations are not obligations of any other entity.

A special service district bond, note, or other obligation or indebtedness, whether or not payable from taxes, may not be:

(1)  considered to be a bond, note, or other obligation or indebtedness of or to be enforceable against the state or a county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision of the state; or

(2)  taken into account in calculating a debt limit applicable to the state or a county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision of the state.

